North Dakota, session 69, HB1608.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. A new section to chapter 34-01 of the North Dakota Century Code is created
and enacted as follows:
Employee leave - Penalty.
1. Notwithstanding any other law, an employer may not deny an employee leave for rest
or worship on a Sunday or a day the employee observes as a religious holiday.
2. Leave requested by an employee under this section may not be limited or restricted in
duration to less than a continuous twenty-four hour period.
3. The labor commissioner shall:
a. Receive and investigate a report from any individual alleging a violation of this
section; and
b. Assess an employer determined to be in violation of this section a fine of five
hundred dollars.
4. The labor commissioner may refer a report of an alleged violation of this section to the
states attorney in the county in which the violation occurred.
5. An employer is not in violation of this section if the employee's leave request was not
granted due to an emergency the employer could not have reasonably avoided.
Page No. 1 25.1319.01000